District of Columbia statutes.
15-308

Endorsement, by marshal, of date of receipt of writ.

Upon the receipt of any writ of fieri facias or other writ of execution, the marshal or his deputy shall, without fee, endorse upon the back of the writ the day of the month and year when he received it.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 526, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 15-308.
1973 Ed., § 15-308.